Hawaii statutes.
§103D-806 Supply of personnel, information,
and technical services. (a) Any public procurement unit is authorized, in
its discretion, upon written request from another public procurement unit or
external procurement unit, to provide personnel to the requesting public
procurement unit or external procurement unit. The public procurement unit or
external procurement unit making the request shall pay the public procurement
unit providing the personnel the direct and indirect cost of furnishing the
personnel, in accordance with an agreement between the parties.

(b) The informational, technical, and other
services of any public procurement unit may be made available to any other
public procurement unit or external procurement unit provided that the requirements
of the public procurement unit tendering the services shall have precedence
over the requesting public procurement unit or external procurement unit. The
requesting public procurement unit or external procurement unit shall pay for
the expenses of the services so provided, in accordance with an agreement
between the parties.

(c) Upon request, the chief procurement
officer may make available to public procurement units or external procurement
units, any of the following services, among others:

(1) Standard forms;

(2) Printed manuals;

(3) Product specifications and standards;

(4) Quality assurance testing services and methods;

(5) Qualified products lists;

(6) Source information;

(7) Common use commodities listings;

(8) Supplier prequalification information;

(9) Supplier performance ratings;

(10) Debarred and suspended bidders lists;

(11) Forms for invitations for bids, requests for
proposals, instructions to bidders, general contract provisions, and other
contract forms; and

(12) Contracts or published summaries of contracts,
including price and time of delivery information.

(d) The State, through the chief procurement
officer, may provide the following technical services, among others:

(1) Development of product specifications;

(2) Development of quality assurance test methods,
including receiving, inspection, and acceptance procedures;

(3) Use of product testing and inspection facilities;
and

(4) Use of personnel training programs.

(e) The chief procurement officer may enter
into contractual arrangements and publish a schedule of fees for the services
provided under subsections (c) and (d). [L Sp 1993, c 8, pt of §2; am L 1998, c
11, §11]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next